Florida, session 2026, HB185.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (21) is added to section 212.08,
Florida Statutes, to read:
212.08 Sales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and
storage tax; specified exemptions.—The sale at retail, the
rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the
storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following
are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this
chapter.
(21) HOME HARDENING PRODUCTS; SALES TAX REFUND.—
(a) As used in this subsection, the term:
1. "Eligible residential property" means a residential
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb185-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 185 2026
property with a site-built dwelling for which a homestead
exemption has been granted under s. 196.031 and which has a just
value of $700,000 or less.
2. "Home hardening product" means an impact-resistant
door, an impact-resistant garage door, or an impact-resistant
window.
3. "Impact-resistant door" means an exterior door system
designed to resist wind and wind-borne debris forces which is
rated for impact resistance and wind pressure in accordance with
any of the following most recent sets of test methods,
standards, and specifications:
a. ASTM International E1886 and E1996;
b. American Architectural Manufacturers Association 506;
or
c. Florida Building Code Testing Application Standard TAS
201, TAS 202, and TAS 203.
4. "Impact-resistant garage door" means a garage door
system designed to resist wind and wind-borne debris forces
which is rated for impact resistance and wind pressure in
accordance with any of the following most recent sets of test
methods, standards, and specifications:
a. ASTM International E1886 and E1996;
b. American Architectural Manufacturers Association 506;
c. Florida Building Code Testing Application Standard TAS
201, TAS 202, TAS 203; or
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb185-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 185 2026
d. ANSI/DASMA 115.
5. "Impact-resistant window" means a window that is
laminated or has been treated with a polycarbonate glazing
system designed to resist wind and wind-borne debris forces
which is rated for impact resistance and wind pressure in
accordance with any of the following most recent sets of test
methods, standards, and specifications:
a. ASTM International E1886 and E1996;
b. American Architectural Manufacturers Association 506;
or
c. Florida Building Code Testing Application Standard TAS
201, TAS 202, and TAS 203.
6. "Owner" means a person who holds the legal title to an
eligible residential property.
7. "Purchase period" means retail purchases made during
the period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2028.
8. "Site-built dwelling" means a dwelling constructed at
its permanent location. The term does not include mobile homes,
manufactured homes, trailers, or any home or trailer that may be
titled or registered in accordance with chapter 319 or chapter
320.
(b) Home hardening products used on eligible residential
property are exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter upon an
affirmative showing to the satisfaction of the department that
the requirements of this subsection have been met, in an amount
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb185-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 185 2026
up to $500 per eligible residential property for purchases made
during the purchase period. This exemption inures to the owner
through a refund of previously paid taxes. To be eligible to
receive a refund, an owner must submit an application to the
department on a form approved by the department which includes
all of the following:
1. The name and address of the owner claiming the refund.
2. The address of the eligible residential property for
which a refund of previously paid taxes is being sought.
3. A sworn statement, submitted under penalty of perjury,
from the owner which specifies the actual cost of the exempt
home hardening products, and the amount of sales tax paid in
this state on the exempt home hardening products, and which
states that the property is an eligible residential property,
and that the home hardening products have been installed in the
eligible residential property. Copies of receipts evidencing
payment of sales tax must be attached to the form.
(c) The owner may submit an application for only one
eligible residential property.
(d) The owner must submit the refund application to the
department between July 1, 2026, and September 30, 2028. Within
30 business days after receipt of the refund application, the
department must determine if the application meets the
requirements of this section. The department must issue a refund
100 within 30 business days after the application is formally
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb185-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 185 2026
101 approved.
102 (e) The department is authorized, and all conditions are
103 deemed met, to adopt emergency rules pursuant to s. 120.54(4) to
104 implement the provisions of this subsection. Emergency rules
105 adopted under this subsection are exempt from s. 120.54(4)(c)
106 and shall remain in effect until the expiration or repeal of
107 this subsection, or until repeal of the emergency rule by the
108 Department of Revenue pursuant to s. 120.54(4)(j), whichever
109 occurs first.
110 (f) This subsection is repealed June 30, 2029.
111 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb185-01-c1